Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-910
Peace officer or law enforcement officer, defined.

(1) Peace officer or law enforcement officer means a sheriff, a jailer, a marshal, a police officer, or an officer of the Nebraska State Patrol.

(2) Peace officer or law enforcement officer includes a member of a tribal police department or federal law enforcement officer duly authorized to assert law enforcement powers by a tribe in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 11;

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 52;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1011;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 30;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 10.